Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2048
Physician assistants; trainee; services performed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a trainee may perform medical services when he or she renders such services within the scope of an approved program.

Laws 1973, LB 101, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 85-179.07;

Laws 1985, LB 132, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.18;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 706.